Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2212.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-11-2.3 and 16-11-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-11 entitled
"Certification of Teachers [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]"
are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-11-2.3. Standardized testing — Issuance of certificates.
(a) No person who obtained an initial certificate prior to January 8, 2002 shall be barred
from certification under this chapter solely because of his or her the person’s score on any
standardized teacher’s examination; provided, however, that he or she the person successfully
completes an assessment, based on criteria established by the board of regents for elementary and
secondary education Rhode Island department of education (RIDE), in accordance with 34 CFR §
200.56.
(b) The board of regents for elementary and secondary Rhode Island department of
education may administer a written examination to prospective teachers seeking certification.
(c) Effective July 1, 2026, all currently certified teachers as of July 1, 2026, shall have their
certifications automatically extended for three (3) or five (5) years, without fee or penalty. This
shall include all teacher certifications issued by the department of education, including, but not
limited to, emergency certifications with conditions.
(d) In order to promote teacher recruitment, for the three (3) year period from July 1, 2026,
through to June 30, 2029 (the "period"), the Rhode Island department of education shall waive all
fees to apply for a teacher initial certification for that period.

16-11-3. Certificates without examination.
(a) The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may, in its discretion,
issue certificates of qualification without examination to persons who may present evidence of
qualification and shall comply with the regulations of the board. Provided, that any teacher who is
certified in two (2) fields or subjects of science, other than general science, shall also be
automatically certified in the field or subject of general science without the need for examination
or other proof of qualifications in the subject of general science.
(b) Any teacher holding a valid Rhode Island teacher certification and who has at least
three (3) years of certified teaching experience, shall be allowed to acquire an additional
certification(s) through examination or content coursework so long as the teacher has a minimum
of three (3) years of certified teaching experience.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-11 of the General Laws entitled "Certification of Teachers [See
Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding
thereto the following section:
16-11-11. Educator preparation programs.
The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall review and
revise as necessary its rules and regulations governing the licensure of teachers and administrators.
The rules and regulations shall be revised so as to create and permit multiple pathways and
flexibility in the credential requirements for both undergraduate and post-baccalaureate degrees to
obtain teacher or administrator certification. In so promulgating these rules and regulations, or
revisions thereto, the department may incorporate awarding credit for non-traditional classes,
work/life experience that is deemed tantamount to formal classwork, and permitting teacher and
administrator candidates to obtain course credit by demonstrating course competency through a test
or other demonstration of competency so as to allow waiver of the course and to provide credit for
the course.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003820/SUB A
========
LC003820/SUB A - Page 2 of 3